Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF72.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2004YH (3) 91 as/js H.F. 72 Section 1. Section 124.401, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 d. (1) Violation Except as provided in subparagraph 3 (2), violation of this subsection , with respect to any other 4 controlled substances, counterfeit substances, simulated 5 controlled substances, or imitation controlled substances 6 classified in schedule IV or V is an aggravated misdemeanor. 7 However, 8 (2) (a) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph 9 division (b), a violation of this subsection involving fifty 10 kilograms or less of marijuana or involving flunitrazepam is a 11 class âDâ felony. 12 (b) A violation of this subsection involving the possession 13 of ten grams or less of marijuana that was not offered for sale 14 is a simple misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled violation 15 under section 805.8A, subsection 14. 16 Sec. 2. Section 124.401, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 17 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 b. If Except as provided in subsection 1, paragraph âdâ , 19 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b), involving ten 20 grams or less of marijuana that was not offered for sale, if 21 the controlled substance is marijuana, the punishment shall 22 be by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six 23 months or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or 24 by both such fine and imprisonment for a first offense. If 25 the controlled substance is marijuana and the person has been 26 previously convicted of a violation of this subsection in which 27 the controlled substance was marijuana, the punishment shall be 28 as provided in section 903.1, subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ . If 29 the controlled substance is marijuana and the person has been 30 previously convicted two or more times of a violation of this 31 subsection in which the controlled substance was marijuana, the 32 person is guilty of an aggravated misdemeanor. 33 Sec. 3. Section 805.8A, subsection 14, Code 2025, is amended 34 by adding the following new paragraph: 35 -1- LSB 2004YH (3) 91 as/js 1/ 2 H.F. 72 NEW PARAGRAPH . q. Marijuana possession violations. For 1 violations under section 124.401, subsection 1, paragraph âdâ , 2 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b), involving ten 3 grams or less of marijuana that was not offered for sale, the 4 scheduled fine is five hundred dollars. 5 Sec. 4. REPEAL. Section 124.410, Code 2025, is repealed. 6